Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1692XC (5) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 232.150, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. In the case of an adjudication of delinquency, 3 the A court shall upon its own motion schedule a sealing of 4 records hearing to be held two years after the date of the last 5 official action relating to a complaint or petition alleging 6 delinquency , or the date the child a person subject to a 7 complaint or petition alleging delinquency becomes eighteen 8 years of age, whichever is later. The court shall also 9 schedule a sealing of records hearing upon application of a 10 person who was the subject of a complaint or petition alleging 11 delinquency that did not result in an adjudication. The court, 12 after hearing, shall order the official juvenile court records 13 in the case sealed, including those specified in sections 14 232.147 , 232.149 , 232.149A , 232.149B , and 915.25 , sealed if the 15 court finds all of the following: 16 (1) The person is eighteen years of age or older and two 17 years have elapsed since the last official action in the 18 personâs case. 19 (2) The person has not been subsequently convicted of a 20 felony or an aggravated or serious misdemeanor or adjudicated 21 a delinquent child for an act which if committed by an 22 adult would be a felony, an aggravated misdemeanor, or a 23 serious misdemeanor and no proceeding is pending seeking such 24 conviction or adjudication. 25 (3) The person was not placed on youthful offender 26 status, transferred back to district court after the youthful 27 offenderâs eighteenth birthday, and sentenced for the offense 28 which precipitated the youthful offender placement. 29 (4) The person was not adjudicated delinquent on an offense 30 involving a violation of section 321J.2 . 31 b. If the court enters an order dismissing a complaint 32 or petition alleging delinquency, the court shall also enter 33 an order sealing all official juvenile court records in the 34 case including those specified in sections 232.147, 232.149, 35 -1- LSB 1692XC (5) 91 dg/ko 1/ 5 S.F. _____ 232.149A, 232.149B, and 915.25. 1 b. c. If the person was adjudicated delinquent for an 2 offense which if committed by an adult would be an aggravated 3 misdemeanor or a felony, the court shall not order the records 4 in the case sealed unless , upon application of the person or 5 upon the courtâs own motion and the state files an objection. 6 If the state files an objection, the court shall set a hearing 7 on the matter. If, after hearing, the court finds that 8 paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (1) and (2), apply and that the 9 sealing is in the best interests of the person and the public , 10 the court shall order the records in the case sealed . 11 d. If the person has been subsequently convicted of a 12 felony, an aggravated misdemeanor, or a serious misdemeanor, 13 the court shall not order the records in the case sealed 14 unless, upon application of the person or upon the courtâs own 15 motion and after hearing, the court finds that sealing is in 16 the best interests of the person and the public. 17 c. e. If the person is required to pay monetary restitution 18 to a victim due to a delinquent act and the restitution is 19 unpaid, the records in the case may be sealed, but the name 20 of the court, the title of the action, and the courtâs file 21 number shall remain unsealed as provided in section 910.10 22 and the restitution amount shall be a judgment and lien as 23 provided in sections 910.7A , 910.8 , 910.10 , and 915.28 until 24 the restitution is paid in full. 25 Sec. 2. Section 232.150, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsection: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. This section shall not be interpreted to 28 preclude the court from scheduling a sealing of records hearing 29 upon application of a person who was the subject of a complaint 30 or petition alleging delinquency. 31 Sec. 3. DISTRICT COURT ââ SEALING OF JUVENILE RECORDS. 32 1. The supreme court shall establish guidance and timelines 33 for each district court to identify and seal all juvenile court 34 records for cases that commenced prior to the effective date 35 -2- LSB 1692XC (5) 91 dg/ko 2/ 5 S.F. _____ of this Act that are eligible to be sealed pursuant to this 1 Act. District courts shall endeavor to seal each record within 2 one year of the date the record is identified as eligible to be 3 sealed pursuant to this Act. 4 2. A person shall not have a cause of action for damages as 5 a result of the district courtâs failure to identify and seal a 6 juvenile court record pursuant to subsection 1. 7 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 8 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 9